Wyoming, session 2025, SF0028.
Be It Enacted by the Legislature of the State of Wyoming:

Section 1. W.S. 21-16-2001 through 21-16-2003 are
created to read:

SF0028

2025 STATE OF WYOMING 25LSO-0080
ARTICLE 20
UNIVERSITY OF WYOMING RESERVE OFFICERS'
TRAINING CORPS ENDOWMENT FUND

21-16-2001. University of Wyoming reserve officers'
training corps endowment fund; accounts; transfers.

(a) The University of Wyoming reserve officers'
training corps endowment fund is created as provided by
W.S. 9-4-204(u)(x).

(b) There is created the University of Wyoming
reserve officers' training corps income account. The state
treasurer shall yearly as soon as possible after July 1
distribute investment earnings from the University of
Wyoming reserve officers' training corps endowment fund to
the University of Wyoming reserve officers' training corps
income account for disbursement and expenditure in
accordance with this article. In any fiscal year, the
University of Wyoming's reserve officers' training corps
programs may expend an amount not to exceed one hundred
percent (100%) of the prior fiscal year's investment
earnings distributed to the University of Wyoming reserve
SF0028

2025 STATE OF WYOMING 25LSO-0080
officers' training corps income account in accordance with
this article.

(c) Accrued interest and other earnings on unexpended
funds within the University of Wyoming reserve officers'
training corps income account shall be credited to the
account.

(d) Any unexpended, unobligated funds remaining in
the University of Wyoming reserve officers' training corps
income account on June 30 of each fiscal year shall be
credited to the University of Wyoming reserve officers'
training corps endowment fund created by W.S. 9-4-204(u)(x)
not later than ninety (90) days after the end of the fiscal
year.

(e) The University of Wyoming board of trustees
shall:

(i) Ensure that all amounts deposited in the
University of Wyoming reserve officers' training corps
income account and available for expenditure under
subsection (b) of this section are disbursed to the
SF0028

2025 STATE OF WYOMING 25LSO-0080
University of Wyoming's reserve officers' training corps
programs for expenditure in accordance with this article
without delay;

(ii) Not account for any amounts disbursed to
the University of Wyoming's reserve officers' training
corps programs under this section when developing the
University of Wyoming's biennial budget request;

(iii) Not decrease any amount from the
University of Wyoming's biennial budget that is budgeted or
allocated to the University of Wyoming's reserve officers'
training corps programs based on the amounts that the
University of Wyoming's reserve officers' training corps
programs receive under this section;

(iv) Not later than December 1 of each year,
report to the joint transportation, highways and military
affairs interim committee and the joint appropriations
committee on the development and implementation of the
University of Wyoming's reserve officers' training corps
programs' budget in accordance with this section.

SF0028

2025 STATE OF WYOMING 25LSO-0080
21-16-2002. University of Wyoming reserve officers'
training corps income account; distributions.

(a) Subject to subsection (b) of this section, the
University of Wyoming's reserve officers' training corps
programs shall use the funds received under W.S. 21-16-2001
for the following purposes:

(i) Academic programs that support the military
including general military courses, officer courses,
military science studies and aerospace studies;

(ii) Tactical laboratory programs including
field training;

(iii) Instructional and resource materials,
classroom equipment and other resources necessary to
support the work of the University of Wyoming's reserve
officers' training corps programs in fulfilling the
purposes specified in paragraphs (i) and (ii) of this
subsection;

SF0028

2025 STATE OF WYOMING 25LSO-0080
(iv) Recruitment and retention of students in
the University of Wyoming's reserve officers' training
corps programs;

(v) The recruitment and retention of faculty
with established reputations for excellence in the military
or military instruction in the programs and opportunities
specified in paragraphs (i) through (iv) of this
subsection;

(vi) Financial aid for students in the
University of Wyoming's reserve officers' training corps
programs including scholarships, grants and tuition
assistance.

21-16-2003. University of Wyoming reserve officers'
training corps endowment; annual report.

(a) Not later than October 1, 2026 and October 1 of
each year thereafter, the University of Wyoming's reserve
officers' training corps programs shall report to the
governor, the joint appropriations committee and the joint
transportation, highways and military affairs interim
SF0028

2025 STATE OF WYOMING 25LSO-0080
committee on the investment, use and expenditure of funds
and investment earnings from the University of Wyoming
reserve officers' training corps endowment fund and
University of Wyoming reserve officer's training corps
income account, including the following:

(i) University of Wyoming's reserve officers'
training corps programs supported through the use and
expenditure of investment earnings including a listing of
expenditures divided by each purpose specified in W.S.
21-16-2002(a)(i) through (vi);

(ii) Faculty positions partially or fully funded
through the investment earnings.

Section 2. W.S. 9-4-204(u) by creating a new
paragraph (x) and 9-4-714(a)(v) are amended to read:

9-4-204. Funds established; use thereof.

(u) Other funds defined as follows shall be
classified by the state auditor pursuant to subsections (s)
and (t) of this section:
SF0028

2025 STATE OF WYOMING 25LSO-0080

(x) University of Wyoming reserve officers'
training corps endowment fund–to consist of funds
appropriated to the fund by law or by gift from whatever
source. In accordance with article 15, section 20 of the
Wyoming constitution, monies within the fund shall not be
expended and may be invested in the same manner as other
permanent funds of the state. Earnings from investment of
monies within the fund are subject to W.S. 21-16-2001
through 21-16-2003 and shall be distributed and expended as
provided by law;

9-4-714. Definitions.

(a) As used in this act:

(v) "Permanent funds" means the permanent
Wyoming mineral trust fund under W.S. 9-4-204(u)(iii), the
Wyoming permanent land fund under W.S. 9-4-204(u)(iv), the
excellence in higher education endowment fund under W.S.
9-4-204(u)(vi), the Hathaway student scholarship endowment
fund under W.S. 9-4-204(u)(vii), the Hathaway expand
Wyoming scholarship endowment fund under W.S.
SF0028

2025 STATE OF WYOMING 25LSO-0080
9-4-204(u)(viii), and the Wyoming's tomorrow scholarship
endowment fund under W.S. 9-4-204(u)(ix) and the University
of Wyoming reserve officers' training corps endowment fund
under W.S. 9-4-204(u)(x);

Section 3. This act is effective July 1, 2025.

(END)
SF0028